Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.030

Required board meetings.

The board of a state trust company shall hold at least one regular meeting each quarter. At each regular meeting the board shall review and approve the minutes of the prior meeting and review the operations, activities, and financial condition of the state trust company. The board may designate committees from among its members to perform these duties and approve or disapprove the committees' reports at each regular meeting. All actions of the board must be recorded in its minutes.

[ 2014 c 37 s 349.]